Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
In General
[Repealed]

§§ 23-5-1 through 23-5-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-5-1. [Codes, 1871, §§ 340 et seq.; 1880, § 121; 1892, § 3601; 1906, § 4107; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6741; 1930, § 6176; 1942, § 3204; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex Sess ch. 30; Laws, 1968 ch. 568, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 509, § 1]

§23-5-3. [Codes, 1871, §§ 340 et seq.; 1880, § 121; 1892, § 3602; 1906, § 4108; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6742; 1930, § 6177; 1942, § 3205; Laws, 1968, ch. 568, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 359, § 1]

§23-5-7. [Codes, 1892, § 3603; 1906, § 4109; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6743; 1930, § 6178; 1942, § 3206; Laws, 1900, ch. 75; Laws, 1984, ch. 460, § 1]

§§23-5-9 and23-5-11. [Codes, 1880, §§ 102, 110; 1892, §§ 3604, 3605; 1906, §§ 4100, 4111; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6744, 6745; 1930, §§ 6179, 6180; 1942, §§ 3207, 3208; Laws, 1980, ch. 425 §§ 2, 3]

§23-5-13. [Codes, 1880, § 103; 1892, § 3606; 1906, § 4112; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6746; 1930, § 6181; 1942, § 3209; Laws, 1964, ch. 509, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 425, § 4]

§23-5-15. [Codes, 1942, § 3909.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 305; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 20]

§ 23-5-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 604, and by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

[Codes, 1942, § 3209.6; Laws 1955, Ex ch. 102, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 449, § 1; Laws, 1962, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 10, §§ 1-4]

§§ 23-5-19 through 23-5-63.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-5-19. [Codes, 1942, § 3209.7; Laws 1955, Ex ch. 102, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 449, § 2; Laws, 1965 Ex Sess, ch. 11, § 1]

§§23-5-21,23-5-23. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3209.8, 3209.9; Laws, 1955, Ex ch. 102, §§ 3, 4]

§23-5-25. [Codes, 1892, § 3607; 1906, § 4113; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6747; 1930, § 6182; 1942, § 3210; Laws, 1952, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 1955, Ex Sess ch. 102, § 5; Laws, 1962, ch. 569, § 3; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 12, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 4]

§23-5-27. [Codes, 1942, § 3210.5; Laws, 1955, Ex ch. 102, § 6]

§23-5-29. [Codes, 1892, § 3615; 1906, § 4122; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6756; 1930, § 6183; 1942, § 3211; Laws, 1894, ch. 51; Laws, 1942, ch. 217; Laws, 1952, ch. 399; Laws, 1955, Ex ch. 103; Laws, 1966, ch. 611, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 5]

§23-5-31. [Codes, 1880, § 106; 1892, § 3611; 1906, § 4117; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6751; 1930, § 6184; 1942, § 3212; Laws, 1955, Ex Sess ch. 99; Laws, 1962, ch. 569, § 2; Laws, 1965, Ex Sess, ch. 13, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 393, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 460, § 2]

§23-5-32. [Laws, 1978, ch. 393, § 1]

§23-5-33. [Codes, 1942, § 3212.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 571, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1965 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 1]

§23-5-35. [Codes 1871, § 343; 1880, § 108; 1892, § 3614; 1906, § 4120; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6754; 1930, § 6186; 1942, § 3214]

§23-5-37. [Codes, 1906, §§ 879, 4121; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4037, 6755; 1930, §§ 4079, 6187; 1942, §§ 3215, 7920; Laws, 1898, ch. 62; Laws, 1908, ch. 109]

§23-5-39. [Codes, 1930, § 6188; 1942, § 3216; Laws, 1924, ch. 154; Laws, 1934, ch. 310]

§23-5-41. [Codes, 1930, § 6189; 1942, § 3217; Laws, 1924, ch. 154]

§§23-5-43 through23-5-47. [Codes, 1880, §§ 113-115; 1892, §§ 3616-3618; 1906, §§ 4123-4125; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6757-6759; Laws, 1930, §§ 6190-6192; 1942, § 3218-3220]

§§23-5-49 and23-5-51. [Codes, 1892, §§ 3619, 3620; 1906, §§ 4126, 4127; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6760, 6761; 1930, §§ 6193, 6194; 1942, §§ 3221, 3222]

§23-5-53. [Codes, 1880, § 116; 1892, § 3622; 1906, § 4129; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6763; 1930, § 6195; 1942, § 3223; Laws, 1964, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 335; Laws, 1981, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 519]

§§23-5-55 and23-5-57. [Codes, 1892, §§ 3624, 3625; 1906, §§ 4131, 4132; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6765, 6766; 1930, §§ 6196,6197; 1942, § 3224, 3225]

§23-5-59. [Codes, 1892, § 3623; 1906, § 4130; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6764; 1930, § 6198; 1942, § 3226; Laws, 1968, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 21]

§23-5-61. [Codes, 1942, § 3226.5; Laws, 1960, ch. 446]

§23-5-63. [Codes, 1892, § 3626; 1906, § 4133; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6767; 1930, § 6199; 1942, § 3227; Laws, 1960, ch. 450]

§§ 23-5-65 through 23-5-69.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

[Codes, 1892, §§ 3626-3629; 1906, §§ 4134-4136; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6768-6770; 1930, §§ 6200-6202; 1942, §§ 3228-3230]

§§ 23-5-71 through 23-5-131.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-5-71. [Codes, 1892, § 3630; 1906, § 4137; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6771; 1930, § 6203; 1942, § 3231; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 64]

§23-5-73. [Codes, 1892, § 3608; 1906, § 4114; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6748; 1930, § 6204; 1942, § 3232; Laws, 1962, ch. 574; Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 3]

§23-5-74. [Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 1]

§23-5-75. [Codes, 1892, § 3621; 1906, § 4128; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6762; 1930, § 6205; 1942, § 3233; Laws, 1977 2d Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 4]

§23-5-76. [Laws, 1977, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 2]

§23-5-77. [Codes, 1892, § 3610; 1906, § 4116; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6750; 1930, § 6206; 1942, § 3234]

§23-5-79. [Codes, 1880, § 124; 1892, § 3635; 1906, § 4142; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6776; 1930, § 6211; 1942, § 3239; Laws, 1968, ch. 570, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 24; Laws, 1979, ch. 487, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 423, §§ 1, 4]

§23-5-80. [Laws, 1983, ch. 423, § 3; Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 14]

§23-5-81. [Codes, 1942, § 3240; Laws, 1938, Ex ch. 84; Laws, 1946, ch. 220; Laws, 1958, ch. 541; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 33; Laws, 1966, ch. 612, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 487, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 423, §§ 2, 4]

§23-5-82. [Laws, 1983, ch. 524, §§ 1, 2]

§23-5-83. [Codes, 1880, § 125; 1892, § 3636; 1906, § 4143; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6777; 1930, § 6212; 1942, § 3241]

§23-5-85. [Codes, 1892, § 3631; 1906, § 4138; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6772; 1930, § 6207; 1942, § 3235; Laws, 1952, ch. 398, § 2; Laws, 1955, Ex ch. 101; Laws, 1962, ch. 575; Laws, 1965 Ex Sess, ch. 18, § 1]

§23-5-89. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (1); 1857, ch. 4, art 1; 1871, § 356; 1880, § 117; 1892, § 3632; 1906, § 4139; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6773; 1930, § 6209; 1942, § 3237; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 22]

§23-5-93. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art. 5 (1); 1857, ch. 4, art. 1; 1871, § 357; 1880, § 118; 1892, § 3633; 1906, § 4140; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6774; 1930, § 6210; 1942, § 3238; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 23; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 16; Laws, 1982, Ex Sess, ch. 17, § 19]

§23-5-95. [Codes, 1871, § 342; 1880, § 122; 1892, § 3634; 1906, § 4141; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6775; 1930, § 6213; 1942, § 3242; Laws, 1968, ch. 568, § 3]

§23-5-97. [Codes, 1942, § 3242.5; Laws, 1966, Ex Sess, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 363]

§23-5-99. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (4); 1857, ch. 4, art 7; 1871, § 369; 1880, § 133; 1892, § 3643; 1906, § 4150; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6784; 1930, § 6214; 1942, § 3243; Laws, 1977 2d Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 486, § 1]

§23-5-101. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art. 5 (14); 1857, ch. 4, art. 9; 1880, § 134; 1892, § 3644; 1906, § 4151; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6785; 1930, § 6215; 1942, § 3244]

§23-5-103. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (4); 1857, ch. 4, art 7; 1871, § 369; 1880, § 135; 1892, § 3645; 1906, § 4152; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6786; 1930, § 6216; 1942, § 3245; Laws, 1980, ch. 486, § 2]

§23-5-105. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (13); 1857, ch. 4, art 6; 1871, § 365; 1880, § 128; 1892, § 3638; 1906, § 4145; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6779; 1930, § 6217; 1942, § 3246]

§23-5-107. [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 4; 1871, § 366; 1880, § 129; 1892, § 3639; 1906, § 4146; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6780; 1930, § 6218; 1942, § 3247]

§23-5-109. [Codes, 1880, § 130; 1892, § 3640; 1906, § 4147; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6781; 1930, § 6219; 1942, § 3248]

§23-5-111. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (15); 1857, ch 4, art 10; 1871, § 364; 1880, § 126; 1892, § 3637; 1906, § 4144; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6778; 1930, § 6220; 1942, § 3249]

§23-5-113. [Codes, 1880, § 145; 1892, § 3676; 1906, § 4183; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6817; 1930, § 6221; 1942, § 3250]

§23-5-115. [Codes, 1892, § 3646; 1906, § 4153; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6787; 1930, § 6222; 1942, § 3251]

§23-5-117. [Codes, 1892, § 3647; 1906, § 4154; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6788; 1930, § 6223; 1942, § 3252; Laws, 1978, ch. 390, § 1]

§23-5-119. [Codes, 1892, § 3651; 1906, § 4158; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6792; 1930, § 6224; 1942, § 3253; Laws, 1968 ch. 571, § 1]

§§23-5-121 through23-5-125. [Codes, 1892, §§ 3659, 3650, 3657; 1906, §§ 4166, 4157, 4164; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6800, 6791, 6798; 1930, §§ 6225-6227; 1942, §§ 3254, 3256]

§23-5-127. [Codes, 1892, § 3660; 1906, § 4167; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6801; 1930, § 6228; 1942, § 3257; Laws, 1968, ch. 571, § 2]

§§23-5-129 and23-5-131. [Codes, 1892, §§ 3658, 3663; 1906, §§ 4165, 4170; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6799, 6804; 1930, §§ 6229, 6230; 1942, §§ 3258, 3259]

§ 23-5-133.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 429, § 3, eff July 1, 1978.

[Codes, 1892, § 3652; 1906, § 4159; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6793; 1930, § 6231; 1942, § 3260; Laws, 1944, ch. 168; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex ch. 11; Laws, 1950, ch. 458, § 7; Laws, 1955, Ex ch. 105; Laws, 1956, ch. 405, § 2; Laws, 1966, ch. 613, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 508, § 2]

§§ 23-5-134 through 23-5-139.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335, 336, 337, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-5-134. [Laws, 1978, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 477, § 4]

§23-5-135. [Codes, 1892, § 3655; 1906, § 4162; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6796; 1930, § 6232; 1942, § 3261; Laws, 1944, ch. 169; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex ch. 12; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 25]

§23-5-136. [Laws, 1984, ch. 439, § 1]

§23-5-137. [Codes, 1892, § 3653; 1906, § 4160; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6794; 1930, § 6233; 1942, § 3262; Laws, 1984, ch. 439, § 2]

§23-5-139. [Codes, 1892, § 3656; 1906, § 4163; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6797; 1930, § 6234; 1942, § 3263; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 26; Laws, 1978, ch. 391, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 401, § 5]

§§ 23-5-140 through 23-5-142.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 501, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-5-140. [Laws, 1986, ch. 501, § 1]

§23-5-141. [Codes, 1892, § 3654; 1906, § 4161; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6795; 1930, § 6235; 1942, § 3264]

§23-5-142. [Laws, 1979, ch. 502, § 1]

§§ 23-5-143 through 23-5-247.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§§23-5-143 through23-5-247. [Codes, 1892, §§ 3658, 3663; 1906, §§ 4165, 4170; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6799, 6804; 1930, §§ 6229, 6230; 1942, §§ 3258, 3259]

§23-5-147. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (6); 1857, ch. 4, art 12; 1871, §§ 370, 371; 1880, § 136; 1892, § 3648; 1906, § 4155; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6789; 1930, § 6238; 1942, § 3267; Laws, 1916, ch. 230; Laws, 1960, ch. 451; Laws, 1964, ch. 511, § 1]

§23-5-149. [Codes, 1892, § 3609; 1906, § 4115; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6749; 1930, § 6239; 1942, § 3268]

§23-5-151. [Codes, 1892, § 3664; 1906, § 4171; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6805; 1930, § 6240; 1942, § 3269; Laws, 1948, ch. 306]

§§23-5-153 and23-5-155. [Codes, 1892, §§ 3649, 3665; 1906, §§ 4156, 4172; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6790, 6806; 1930, §§ 6241, 6242; 1942, §§ 3270, 3271]

§23-5-157. [Codes, 1892, § 3666; 1906, § 4173; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6807; 1930, § 6243; 1942, § 3272; Laws, 1928, ch. 196]

§§23-5-159 and23-5-161. [Codes, 1892, §§ 3668, 3669; 1906, §§ 4175, 4176; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6809, 6810; 1930, §§ 6245, 6246; 1942, §§ 3274, 3275]

§23-5-163. [Codes, 1871, § 367; 1880, § 143; 1892, § 3674; 1906, § 4181; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6815; 1930, § 6247; 1942, § 3276]

§23-5-165. [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 18; 1871, § 368; 1880, § 144; 1892, § 3675; 1906, § 4182; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6816; 1930, § 6248; 1942, § 3277]

§23-5-167. [Codes, 1871, § 377; 1880, § 139; 1892, § 3670; 1906, § 4177; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6811; 1930, § 6249; 1942, § 3278]

§23-5-169. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (9); 1857, ch. 4, art 13; 1871, § 377; 1880, § 138; 1892, § 3671; 1906, § 4178; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6812; 1930, § 6250; 1942, § 3279; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 27]

§23-5-171. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (8); 1857, ch. 4, art 14; 1871, § 378; 1880, § 140; 1892, § 3672; 1906, § 4179; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6813; 1930, § 6251; 1942, § 3280; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 28; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 17; Laws, 1982, Ex Sess, ch. 17, § 20]

§23-5-173. [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 15; 1871, § 378; 1880, § 141; 1892, § 3673; 1906, § 4180; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6814; 1930, § 6252; 1942, § 3281; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 29]

§23-5-175. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (16); 1857, ch. 4, art 5; 1880, § 131; 1892, § 3641; 1906, § 4148; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6782; 1930, § 6253; 1942, § 3282]

§23-5-177. [Codes, 1880, § 132; 1892, § 3642; 1906, § 4149; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6783; 1930, § 6254; 1942, § 3283]

§23-5-179. [Codes, 1892, § 3704; 1906, § 4211; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6847; 1930, § 6255; 1942, § 3284; Laws, 1976, ch. 350, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 397, § 1]

§23-5-181. [Codes, 1892, § 3705; 1906, § 4212; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6348; 1930, § 6256; 1942, § 3285]

§23-5-183. [Codes, 1892, § 3706; 1906, § 4213; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6849; 1930, § 6257; 1942, § 3286; Laws, 1932, ch. 298; Laws, 1938, ch. 306; Laws, 1950, ch. 281; Laws, 1960, ch. 452, § 1; Laws, 1966 ch. 614, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 511, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 401 § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 497, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 487, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 510]

§23-5-184. [Laws, 1973, ch. 346 § 1]

§23-5-185. [Codes, 1942, § 3286.5; Laws, 1954, ch. 357, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 452, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 30]

§23-5-187. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 7 (1); 1857, ch. 4, art 23; 1871, § 391; 1880, § 150; 1892, § 3679; 1906, § 4186; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6820; 1930, § 6258; 1942 § 3287]

§23-5-189. [Codes, 1880, § 151; 1892, § 3680; 1906, § 4187; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6821; 1930, § 6259; 1942, § 3288]

§23-5-191. [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 21; 1871, § 389; 1880, § 148; 1892, § 3677; 1906, § 4184; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6818; 1930, § 6260; 1942, § 3289]

§23-5-193. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (20); 1857, ch. 4, art 20; 1871, § 388; 1880, § 147; 1892, § 3678; 1906, § 4185; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6819; 1930, § 6261; 1942, § 3290]

§23-5-195. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 6 (2); 1857, ch. 4, art 26; 1871, § 394; 1880, § 154; 1892, § 3681; 1906, § 4188; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6822; 1930, § 6262; 1942, § 3291]

§23-5-196. [Laws, 1979, ch. 343, §§ 1, 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 303, § 1]

§23-5-197. [Codes, 1906, § 4189; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6823; 1930, § 6263; 1942, § 3292; Laws, 1900, ch. 79; Laws, 1948, ch. 259; Laws, 1958, ch. 542; Laws, 1966, ch. 615, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 465, § 2]

§23-5-199. [Codes, 1880, § 155; 1892, § 3682; 1906, § 4191; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6825; 1930, § 6265; 1942, § 3294; Laws, 1966, ch. 615, § 3]

§23-5-201. [Codes, 1857, ch 4, art 29; 1871, § 395; 1880, § 157; 1892, § 3684; 1906, § 4192; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6826; 1930, § 6266; 1942, § 3295; Laws, 1956, ch. 405, § 1]

§23-5-203. [Codes, 1880, § 158; 1892, § 3685; 1906, § 4193; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6827; 1930, § 6267; 1942, § 3296; Laws, 1954, ch. 356; Laws, 1984, ch. 465, § 1]

§23-5-205. [Codes, 1942, § 3296.5; Laws, 1966 Ex Sess, ch. 32, §§ 1, 2]

§23-5-207. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (1); 1857, ch. 4, art 39; 1871, § 362; 1880, § 165; 1892, § 3699; 1906, § 4206; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6842; 1930, § 6268; 1942, § 3297]

§23-5-209. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (2); 1857, ch. 4, art 40; 1871, § 380; 1880, § 166; 1892, § 3700; 1906, § 4207; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6843; 1930, § 6269; 1942, § 3298; Laws, 1944, Ex ch. 2]

§23-5-210. [Laws, 1982, ch. 478, § 1]

§23-5-211. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (6); 1857, ch. 4, art 41; 1871, § 381; 1880, § 167; 1892, § 3701; 1906, § 4208; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6844; 1930, § 6270; 1942, § 3299]

§23-5-213. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (4); 1857, ch. 4, art 42; 1871, § 382; 1880, § 168; 1892, § 3702; 1906, § 4209; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6845; 1930, § 6271; 1942, § 3300; Laws, 1902, ch. 105; Laws, 1944, Ex ch. 4]

§23-5-215. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 4 (5); 1857, ch. 4, art 43; 1880, § 169; 1892, § 3703; 1906, § 4210; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6846; 1930, § 6272; 1942, § 3301]

§23-5-217. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (10); 1857, ch. 4, art 32; 1871, § 360; 1880, § 160; 1892, § 3687; 1906, § 4194; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6828; 1930, § 6273; 1942, § 3302]

§23-5-219. [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 33; 1880, § 161; 1892, § 3688; 1906, § 4195; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6829; 1930, § 6274; 1942, § 3303]

§23-5-221. [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 35; 1871, § 361; 1880, § 162; 1892, § 3689; 1906, § 4196; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6830; 1930, § 6275; 1942, § 3304; Laws, 1968 ch. 572, §§ 1, 2]

§23-5-223. [Codes, 1892, § 3691; 1906, § 4198; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6832; 1930, § 6276; 1942, § 3305; Laws, 1902, ch. 61; Laws, 1932, ch. 136; Laws, 1952, ch. 401, § 1; Laws, 1956, ch. 407; Laws, 1962, ch. 576, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 616, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 1981, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 8, § 1]

§23-5-225. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 11; 1857, ch. 4, art 36; 1880, § 163; 1892, § 3690; 1906, § 4197; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6831; 1930, § 6277; 1942, § 3306]

§23-5-227. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6834; 1930, § 6278; 1942, § 3307; Laws, 1914, ch. 148]

§§23-5-229 and23-5-231. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6835, 6836; 1930, §§ 6279, 6280; 1942, §§ 3308, 3309; Laws, 1914, ch. 148]

§23-5-233. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6840; 1930, § 6283; 1942, § 3312; Laws, 1914, ch. 150; Laws, 1973, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 465, § 3]

§§23-5-235 and23-5-237. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 6837, 6838, 6850; 1930, §§ 6281, 6284, 6292; 1942, §§ 3311-3313; Laws, 1914, ch. 150]

§23-5-239. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6850; 1930, § 6284; 1942, § 3313; Laws, 1916, ch. 161]

§23-5-241. [Codes, 1942, § 3313.5; Laws, 1952, ch. 244, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1964, ch. 361; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 31]

§23-5-243. [Hemingway’s 1917, § 6851; 1930, § 6285; 1942, § 3314; Laws, 1916, ch. 161]

§23-5-245. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6852; 1930, § 6286; 1942, § 3315; Laws, 1916, ch. 161; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 32]

§23-5-247. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6855; 1930, § 6287; 1942, §§ 3190, 3316; Laws, 1916, ch. 161; Laws, 1935, ch. 19]